Utah statutes.
76-10-523.   Persons exempt from weapons laws.

(1)  This part and Title 53, Chapter 5, Part 7, Concealed Weapon Act, do not apply to any of the following:

(a)  a United States marshal;

(b)  a federal official required to carry a firearm;

(c)  a peace officer of this or any other jurisdiction;

(d)  a law enforcement official as defined and qualified under Section 53-5-711;

(e)  a judge as defined and qualified under Section 53-5-711;

(f)  a common carrier while engaged in the regular and ordinary transport of firearms as merchandise; or

(g)  a nonresident traveling in or through the state, provided that any firearm is:

(i)  unloaded; and

(ii)  securely encased as defined in Section 76-10-501.

(2)  The provisions of Subsections 76-10-504(1) and (2), and Section 76-10-505 do not apply to any person to whom a permit to carry a concealed firearm has been issued:

(a)  pursuant to Section 53-5-704; or

(b)  by another state or county.



Amended by Chapter 362, 2009 General Session

